Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB6.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.320 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 157.310 to 157.440, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Average daily attendance" means the aggregate days attended by pupils in a public
school, adjusted for weather-related low attendance days if applicable, divided by
the actual number of days the school is in session, after the five (5) days with the
lowest attendance have been deducted.
(a) Aggregate days shall include, in addition to the aggregate number of days
attended by a pupil who was suspended during a school year, the number of
days the pupil was suspended, not to exceed ten (10) days in total for the
school year; and
(b) Aggregate days shall include, in addition to the aggregate number of days
attended by a pupil who was expelled for behavioral problems, the number of
days the pupil was expelled up to a total of one hundred seventy-five (175)
days. This total may extend into the next school year and shall be counted in
the average daily attendance for the next year;
(2) "Base funding level" means a guaranteed amount of revenue per pupil to be
provided for each school district, to be used for regular operating and capital
expenditures;
(3) "Board" means the board of education of any county or independent school district;
(4) "District" means any school district as defined by law;
(5) "Elementary school" means a school consisting of the primary school program
through grade eight (8) as defined in KRS 158.030, or any appropriate combination
of grades within this range, as determined by the plan of organization for schools
authorized by the district board;
(6) "Support Education Excellence in Kentucky" means the level of educational
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
services and facilities which is to be provided in each district from the public school
fund, including on-behalf costs;
(7) "Kindergarten full-time equivalent pupil in average daily attendance" means each
kindergarten pupil counted no more than one-half (1/2) day in the aggregate days
attended by kindergarten pupils in a public school divided by the actual number of
days school is in session after the five (5) days with the lowest attendance have
been deducted. Kindergarten is the entry level of the primary program and shall be
provided no less than the equivalent of one-half (1/2) day, five (5) days a week for a
full school year for each kindergarten pupil;
(8) "Public school fund" means the fund created by KRS 157.330 for use in financing
education in public elementary and secondary schools;
(9) "Administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education" means those
regulations which the Kentucky Board of Education may adopt upon the
recommendation and with the advice of the commissioner of education. The
commissioner of education shall recommend administrative regulations necessary
for carrying out the purposes of KRS 157.310 to 157.440;
(10) "Distributable cost" means the amount that is to be distributed to a district to
provide and maintain the district's educational services and facilities;
(11) "Experience" means employment as a teacher, other than as a substitute or nursery
school teacher, for a minimum of one hundred forty (140) days during a school year
in a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or college or university
that is approved by the public accrediting authority in the state in which the
teaching duties were performed. A teacher who is employed by a board for at least
one hundred forty (140) days of a school year and who performs teaching duties for
the equivalent of at least seventy (70) full school days during that school year,
regardless of the schedule on which those duties were performed, shall be credited
with one (1) year of experience. A teacher who is employed by a board for at least
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
one hundred forty (140) days during each of two (2) school years and who performs
teaching duties for the equivalent of at least seventy (70) full school days during
those years shall be credited with one (1) year of experience. No more than one (1)
year of experience shall be credited for the performance of teaching duties during a
single school year;
(12)[(11)] "Secondary school" means a school consisting of grades seven (7) through
twelve (12), or any appropriate combination of grades within this range as
determined by the plan of organization for schools authorized by the district board.
When grades seven (7) through nine (9) or ten (10) are organized separately as a
junior high school, or grades ten (10) through twelve (12) are organized separately
as a senior high school and are conducted in separate school plant facilities, each
shall be considered a separate secondary school for the purposes of KRS 157.310 to
157.440;
(13)[(12)] "Single salary schedule" means a schedule adopted by a local board from
which all teachers are paid for one hundred eighty-five (185) days and is based on
training, experience, and such other factors as the Kentucky Board of Education
may approve and which does not discriminate between salaries paid elementary and
secondary teachers. If the budget bill contains a minimum statewide salary
schedule, no teacher shall be paid less than the amount specified in the biennial
budget salary schedule for the individual teacher's educational qualifications and
experience;
(14)[(13)] "Teacher" means any regular or special teacher, principal, supervisor,
superintendent, assistant superintendent, librarian, director of pupil personnel, or
other member of the teaching or professional staff engaged in the service of the
public elementary and secondary school for whom certification is required as a
condition of employment;
(15)[(14)] "On-behalf cost" means the amount that a district is obligated to disburse
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
that is incurred in providing educational services and that is paid on behalf of the
district by the state;
(16) "Percentage of attendance" means the aggregate days attended by pupils in a public
school for the school year divided by the aggregate days' membership of pupils in a
public school for the school year;
(17)[(15)] "Middle school" means a school consisting of grades five (5) through eight (8)
or any appropriate combination of grades as determined by the plan of organization
for schools authorized by the district board;
(18)[(16)] "National board certification salary supplement" means an annual supplement
added for the life of the certificate to the base salary of a teacher who attains
national board certification; and
(19)[(17)] "Weather-related low attendance day" means a school day on which the
district's attendance falls below the average daily attendance for the prior year due
to inclement weather. The district shall submit a request to substitute the prior
year's average daily attendance for its attendance on up to ten (10) designated days,
along with documentation that the low attendance was due to inclement weather,
for approval by the commissioner of education in accordance with Kentucky Board
of Education administrative regulations.
Section 2. KRS 157.330 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established the fund to support education excellence in Kentucky
consisting of appropriations for distribution to districts and on behalf of districts in
accordance with the provisions of KRS 157.310 to 157.440.
(2) The resources of the public school fund shall be paid into the State Treasury, and
shall be drawn out or appropriated only in aid of public schools as provided by
statute.
Section 3. KRS 157.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In determining the total cost of the program to support education excellence in
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
Kentucky, the on-behalf cost and distributable cost shall be calculated together.
The total base funding level shall be computed by dividing the total cost of the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky by the prior year's
statewide average daily attendance. The total cost shall be calculated according to
the following:
(a) In determining the on-behalf cost of the program to support education
excellence in Kentucky, the sum of the following shall be used:
1. The cost of the employer's fixed statutory contribution rate established
in KRS 161.550(1) for nonfederally funded employees in the Teachers'
Retirement System of all school districts as estimated by the Kentucky
Department of Education in collaboration with the Teachers'
Retirement System;
2. The cost of the employer contributions for health insurance and
health reimbursement accounts of all school districts as determined by
the Personnel Cabinet for the employee health plans established
pursuant to KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287; and
3. Any additional funds necessary to meet the full actuarially determined
employer contributions of the Teachers' Retirement System pension
fund to fund existing statutory benefits as determined by the system's
consulting actuary in the annual actuarial valuation conducted
pursuant to KRS 161.400 and any funds requested to fund retiree
health benefits pursuant to KRS 161.550(2);
(b) In determining the distributable cost of the program to support education
excellence in Kentucky, the statewide guaranteed base funding level, as
defined in KRS 157.320, shall be computed by dividing the amount
appropriated for this purpose by the prior year's statewide average daily
attendance; and[.]
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
(c)[(b)] When determining the biennial appropriations for the program, the
average daily attendance for each fiscal year shall include an estimate of the
number of students graduating early under the provisions of KRS 158.142.
(2) Each district shall receive an amount equal to the base funding level for each pupil
in average daily attendance in the district in the previous year, except a district shall
receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion of the average
statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated
early under the provisions of KRS 158.142. Each district's base funding level shall
be adjusted by the following factors:
(a) The number of at-risk students in the district. At-risk students shall be
identified as those approved for the free lunch program under state and federal
guidelines. The number of at-risk students shall be multiplied by a factor to be
established by the General Assembly. Funds generated under this paragraph
may be used to pay for:
1. Alternative programs for students who are at risk of dropping out of
school before achieving a diploma; and
2. A hazardous duty pay supplement as determined by the local board of
education to the teachers who work in alternative programs with
students who are violent or assaultive;
(b) The number and types of exceptional children in the district as defined by
KRS 157.200. Specific weights for each category of exceptionality shall be
used in the calculation of the add-on factor for exceptional children; and
(c) Transportation costs. The per-pupil cost of transportation shall be calculated
as provided by KRS 157.370. Districts which contract to furnish
transportation to students attending nonpublic schools may adopt any payment
formula which ensures that no public school funds are used for the
transportation of nonpublic students.
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
(3) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and each year thereafter, the General
Assembly shall annually allocate funds equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion
of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student
who graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142 the previous school year
to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for deposit in the early
graduation scholarship trust fund.
(4) The program to support education excellence in Kentucky shall be fully
implemented by the 1994-95 school year.
(5) (a) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, the commissioner of education shall enforce maximum class sizes for
every academic course requirement in all grades except in vocal and
instrumental music, and physical education classes. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, the maximum number of pupils enrolled in a
class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in primary grades (kindergarten through third grade);
2. Twenty-eight (28) in grade four (4);
3. Twenty-nine (29) in grades five (5) and six (6);
4. Thirty-one (31) in grades seven (7) to twelve (12).
(b) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, class size loads for middle and secondary school classroom teachers
shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred fifty (150) pupil hours per day.
(c) The commissioner of education, upon approval of the Kentucky Board of
Education, shall adopt administrative regulations for enforcing this provision.
These administrative regulations shall include procedures for a superintendent
to request an exemption from the Kentucky Board of Education when unusual
circumstances warrant an increased class size for an individual class. A
request for an exemption shall include specific reasons for the increased class
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
size with a plan for reducing the class size prior to the beginning of the next
school year. A district shall not receive in any one (1) year exemptions for
more classes than enroll twenty percent (20%) of the pupils in the primary
grades and grades four (4) through eight (8).
(d) In all schools the commissioner of education shall enforce the special
education maximum class sizes set by administrative regulations adopted by
the Kentucky Board of Education. A superintendent may request an
exemption pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection. A local school council
may request a waiver pursuant to KRS 156.160(2). An exemption or waiver
shall not be granted if the increased class size will impede any exceptional
child from achieving his or her individual education program in the least
restrictive environment.
(6) In grades four (4) through six (6) with combined grades, the maximum class size
shall be the average daily attendance upon which funding is appropriated for the
lowest assigned grade in the class. There shall be no exceptions to the maximum
class size for combined classes. In combined classes other than the primary grades,
no ungraded students shall be placed in a combined class with graded students. In
addition, there shall be no more than two (2) consecutive grade levels combined in
any one (1) class in grades four (4) through six (6). However, this shall not apply to
schools which have implemented school-based decision making.
(7) If a local school district, through its admission and release committee, determines
that an appropriate program in the least restrictive environment for a particular child
with a disability includes either part-time or full-time enrollment with a private
school or agency within the state or a public or private agency in another state, the
school district shall count as average daily attendance in a public school the time
that the child is in attendance at the school or agency, contingent upon approval by
the commissioner of education.
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
(8) Pupils attending a center for child learning and study established under an
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 shall, for the purpose of calculating
average daily attendance, be considered as in attendance in the school district in
which the child legally resides and which is party to the agreement. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, teachers who are actually employees of the joint or
cooperative action shall be considered as employees of each school district which is
a party to the agreement.
(9) Program funding shall be increased when the average daily attendance in any
district for the first two (2) months of the current school year is greater than the
average daily attendance of the district for the first two (2) months of the previous
school year. The program funds allotted the district shall be increased by the
percent of increase. The average daily attendance in kindergarten is the
kindergarten full-time equivalent pupils in average daily attendance.
(10) If the average daily attendance for the current school year in any district decreases
by ten percent (10%) or more than the average daily attendance for the previous
school year, the average daily attendance for purposes of calculating program
funding for the next school year shall be increased by an amount equal to two-thirds
(2/3) of the decrease in average daily attendance. If the average daily attendance
remains the same or decreases in the succeeding school year, the average daily
attendance for purposes of calculating program funding for the following school
year shall be increased by an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the decrease for the
first year of the decline.
(11) If the percentage of attendance of any school district shall have been reduced more
than two percent (2%) during the previous school year, the program funding
allotted the district for the current school year shall be increased by the difference in
the percentage of attendance for the two (2) years immediately prior to the current
school year less two percent (2%).
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
(12) (a) Instructional salaries for vocational agriculture classes shall be for twelve (12)
months per year. Vocational agriculture teachers shall be responsible for the
following program of instruction during the time period beyond the regular
school term established by the local board of education: supervision and
instruction of students in agriculture experience programs; group and
individual instruction of farmers and agribusinessmen; supervision of student
members of agricultural organizations who are involved in leadership training
or other activity required by state or federal law; or any program of vocational
agriculture established by the Department of Education. During extended
employment, no vocational agriculture teacher shall receive salary on a day
that the teacher is scheduled to attend an institution of higher education class
which could be credited toward meeting any certification requirement.
(b) Each teacher of agriculture employed shall submit an annual plan for summer
program to the local school superintendent for approval. The summer plan
shall include a list of tasks to be performed, purposes for each task, and time
to be spent on each task. Approval by the local school superintendent shall be
in compliance with the guidelines developed by the Department of Education.
The supervision and accountability of teachers of vocational agriculture's
summer programs shall be the responsibility of the local school
superintendent. The local school superintendent shall submit to the
commissioner of education a completed report of summer tasks for each
vocational agriculture teacher. Twenty percent (20%) of the approved
vocational agriculture programs shall be audited annually by the State
Department of Education to determine that the summer plan has been properly
executed.
(13) (a) In allotting program funds for home and hospital instruction, statewide
guaranteed base funding, excluding the capital outlay, shall be allotted for
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
each child in average daily attendance in the prior school year who has been
properly identified according to Kentucky Board of Education administrative
regulations. Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall
be reported monthly on forms provided by the Department of Education; and
(b) Pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education,
local school districts shall be reimbursed for home and hospital instruction for
pupils unable to attend regular school sessions because of short-term health
impairments. A reimbursement formula shall be established by administrative
regulations to include such factors as a reasonable per hour, per child
allotment for teacher instructional time, with a maximum number of funded
hours per week, a reasonable allotment for teaching supplies and equipment,
and a reasonable allotment for travel expenses to and from instructional
assignments, but the formula shall not include an allotment for capital outlay.
Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported
annually on forms provided by the Department of Education.
(14) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making
and the school council has voted to waive this subsection, kindergarten aides shall
be provided for each twenty-four (24) full-time equivalent kindergarten students
enrolled.
(15) Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be no deduction applied against the base funding
level for any pupil in average daily attendance who spends a portion of his or her
school day in a program at a state-operated career and technical education or
vocational facility.
(16) During a fiscal year, a school district may request that the Department of Education
recalculate its funds allocated under this section if the current year average daily
attendance for the twenty (20) day school month as defined in KRS 158.060(1) that
contains the most days within the calendar month of January exceeds the prior year
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1647
adjusted average daily attendance plus growth by at least one percent (1%). Any
adjustments in the allotments approved under this subsection shall be proportional
to the remaining days in the school year and subject to available funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
(17) To calculate the state portion of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky for a school district, the Department of Education shall subtract the local
effort required under KRS 157.390(5) from the calculated base funding under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky, as required by this section.
The value of the real estate used in this calculation shall be the lesser of the current
year assessment or the prior year assessment increased by four percent (4%) plus
the value of current year new property. The calculation under this subsection shall
be subject to available funds.
(18) Notwithstanding any other statute or budget of the Commonwealth language to the
contrary, time missed due to shortening days for emergencies may be made up by
lengthening school days in the school calendar without any loss of funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
Section 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:09 PM Jacketed